Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1452
Supplementary principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the provisions of the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act, the principles of law and equity, including the law relating to capacity to contract, mutuality of obligations, principal and agent, real property, public health, safety and fire prevention, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause shall supplement the provisions of the act.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 3.